New York, session 2025-2026, A158.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 16-102 of the election law, as 2 amended by chapter 474 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. A proceeding with respect to a petition shall be instituted: (a) 5 within fourteen days after the last day to file the petition[,]; (b) 6 within four days after the last day that a certificate to fill a vacancy 7 in a designation shall be filed[, or]; (c) within three business days 8 after the officer or board with whom or which such petition was filed, 9 makes a determination of invalidity with respect to such petition or 10 certificate to fill a vacancy; or (d) within three business days after 11 the proper service of pleadings for a timely proceeding to invalidate a 12 petition, whichever is later; except that a proceeding with respect to a 13 petition for a village election or a nomination for a special election 14 shall be instituted within seven days after the last day to file the 15 certificate or petition for such village election or nomination or with- 16 in three business days after the officer or board with whom or which 17 such certificate or petition was filed, makes a determination of inva- 18 lidity with respect to such certificate or petition, whichever is later. 19 A proceeding with respect to a primary, convention, meeting of a party 20 committee, or caucus shall be instituted within ten days after the hold- 21 ing of such primary or convention or the filing of the certificate of 22 nominations made at such caucus or meeting of a party committee. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00289-01-5